Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.240

Bidding—Prohibited practices—Penalty.

The following requirements shall apply to bidding at auctions:

(1) An auctioneer conducting an auction and an auction company where an auction is being held shall not bid on or offer to buy any goods or real property at the auction unless the auctioneer or the auction company discloses the name of the person on whose behalf the bid or offer is being made.

(2) An auctioneer and an auction company shall not use any method of bidding at an auction that will allow goods or real property to be purchased in an undisclosed manner on behalf of the auctioneer or auction company.

(3) At a public auction conducted or supervised by an auctioneer or auction company, the auctioneer or auction company shall not fictitiously raise any bid, knowingly permit any person to make a fictitious bid, or employ or use another person to act as a bidder or buyer.

(4) All goods or real property offered for sale at an auction shall be subject to a reserve or a confirmation from the owner or consignor unless otherwise indicated by the auctioneer or auction company. Except as provided in this subsection, an auctioneer or auction company shall not use any method of bidding at an auction that allows the auctioneer or auction company to avoid selling any property offered for sale at auction.

(5) A licensee who violates any provision of this section shall be subject to an administrative fine in a sum not exceeding five hundred dollars for each violation.

[ 1986 c 324 s 22.]